California, session 20252026, AB1718.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44320 of the Education Code is amended to read:44320. (a) Professional preparation, including student teaching, shall be made available in the upper division course offerings at all California public institutions of higher learning, except the California Maritime Academy and the college named in Section 92200. College of the Law, San Francisco. No more than nine semester units, or the equivalent, of professional education courses may be designated as prerequisites for purposes of admission to student teaching, except that, to satisfy the English language requirement as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, candidates may be required to take 12 semester units, or the equivalent, as professional education prerequisites to student teaching.(b) The commission shall encourage postsecondary institutions of higher education that offer programs of professional preparation to collaborate with school districts, county offices of education, and professional organizations in the design and delivery of local programs to function as part of the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program pursuant to Section 44279.2. If local educational agencies and institutions of higher education voluntarily agree to implement the program, the following provisions shall apply to each collaborative effort:(1) Postsecondary institutions Institutions of higher education and local educational agencies shall coordinate and articulate the program of professional preparation and the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program, so the two programs provide continuity in the preparation, support, and assessment of beginning teachers.(2) At the discretion of a postsecondary an institution of higher education that participates in a collaborative effort, the program of professional preparation may be submitted to the commission for approval as a program of preparation, support, and assessment that is at least two years long.(3) In each program of preparation, support, and assessment, the postsecondary institution of higher education shall make it possible for each candidate to complete all requirements for a valid teaching credential in the equivalent of one year of full-time study.(4) A postsecondary An institution of higher education that participates in a collaborative effort may, at its discretion, determine that successful completion of the support and assessment components of an articulated program of professional preparation, support, and assessment fulfills some or all of the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 44259, and may accordingly recommend applicants for the professional teaching credential. The standards and criteria for making these determinations and recommendations shall be included in the institution’s proposal for a program.(5) A local educational agency that collaborates, at its own discretion, with a postsecondary education an institution of higher education in the design and delivery of an articulated program of professional preparation, support, and assessment that meets the standards and criteria pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 44279.2, and that receives funds pursuant to the annual Budget Act, may contract with the postsecondary institution of higher education to pay the institution’s costs of designing and delivering the support and assessment components of the program.(c) Local educational agencies that are approved by the commission to provide programs of personalized preparation to candidates for designated subjects teaching credentials are encouraged to participate in the design and delivery of local programs under the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment Program pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44279.2), in a manner consistent with subdivision (b).(d) Before admission to either student teaching under any professional preparation program approved by the commission, commission or participation in a field experience program as described in Section 44324, a candidate for a credential shall obtain a certificate of clearance from the commission which that shall be issued when the commission has verified the candidate’s personal identification and health status. The fee for the certificate of clearance shall not exceed one-half of the regular fee for a credential and shall be deducted from the fee for the initial credential applied for by the certificate holder.